Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5603.01
Nonresident reinsurance intermediary license; reciprocal licensure; continuing education.

(1) The director shall waive any requirements for a nonresident reinsurance intermediary license applicant with a valid license from the applicant's home state, except the requirements imposed by section 44-5603, if the applicant's home state awards nonresident licenses to residents of this state on the same basis.

(2) A nonresident reinsurance intermediary's satisfaction of any applicable home-state continuing education requirements, if any, for licensed insurance producers or reinsurance intermediaries shall constitute satisfaction of the continuing education requirements of this state if the home state of the reinsurance intermediary recognizes the satisfaction of its continuing education requirements imposed upon insurance producers or reinsurance intermediaries from this state on the same basis.

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 40.